Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Behavioral Health Housing Incentive Fund  is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The  Behavioral Health Housing In-
centive Fund consists of moneys deposited  or transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly and moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly. Interest earned
on the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in  the Behavioral Health Housing Incentive Fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.385.
SECTION 2.
On the effective date of this 2021  Act, interest earned on the Housing for
Mental Health Fund established in ORS 458.380  shall be transferred to the Behavioral Health
Housing Incentive Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Any unobligated funds remaining in the Housing for Mental Health Fund
established in ORS 458.380 on June 30, 2022, shall be transferred  to and deposited in the Be-
havioral Health Housing Incentive Fund established in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 458.380 is amended to read:
458.380. (1) The Housing for  Mental Health Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Housing for Mental  Health Fund consists of moneys de-
posited in the fund under  section 8, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, and may include moneys ap-
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by  the Legislative Assembly or otherwise
and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Housing and Community Services
Department for disbursement for  the purposes set forth in [ ORS 458.385 ] section 8, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015.
SECTION 5.  ORS 458.385 is amended to read:
458.385. (1) The [ Housing and Community Services Department, in collaboration with  the] Oregon
Health Authority[ ,] shall disburse  moneys in the [ Housing for Mental Health Fund ] Behavioral
Health Housing Incentive Fund established in  section 1 of this 2021 Act  to provide funding for:
(a) The development of community-based  housing, including licensed residential treatment facil-
ities, for individuals with mental illness and individuals with substance use disorders; and
(b) Crisis intervention services, rental subsidies and other housing-related services  to help keep
individuals with  mental illness and individuals with substance use disorders safe and healthy in their
communities.
Enrolled House Bill 2316 (HB 2316-B) Page 1
(2) The [ department] authority shall provide funding for:
(a) A portion of the costs to purchase land and to construct housing described in  subsection
(1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Up to 50 percent of the start-up costs  for providing housing described in subsection (1)(a)
of this section, including but not limited to fixtures, furnishings and training of staff.
(3)(a) The [ department] authority shall prescribe the financing mechanisms to be used to provide
funding under subsection (2)(a) of this section of up to 35 percent of the total project  development
costs.
(b) The [ department] authority  may waive the 35 percent limit on total project development
costs under paragraph (a) of this subsection for a low-cost project or to  meet a critical need in a
rural area.
(4) The [ department] authority shall convene an advisory group to make recommendations to the
[department] authority for:
(a) The allocation of moneys between different types of housing;
(b) The financing of housing described in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(c) The provision of services described in subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(d) Soliciting funding proposals; and
(e) Processing applications for funding.
(5) The advisory group convened under subsection (4) of this section must include:
(a) One representative of a private provider of mental health treatment;
(b) One representative of a private provider of substance abuse treatment;
(c) Two  representatives of groups that advocate on behalf of consumers of mental health or
substance abuse treatment;
(d) One staff person from the  Housing and Community Services  Department;
(e) One  staff person from the division of the [ Oregon Health ] authority that regulates mental
health and substance abuse treatment programs;
(f) Two consumers of mental health or substance abuse treatment;
(g) One representative of a community mental health program;
(h) One person with expertise in developing and  financing community housing projects in rural
communities; and
(i) One representative of community corrections.
SECTION 6.
ORS 458.380 is repealed on June 30, 2022.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2316 (HB 2316-B) Page 2
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2316 (HB 2316-B) Page 3